District of Columbia statutes.
25-503

Minimum annual fees for manufacturer’s, wholesaler’s, and off-premises retailer’s licenses.

The minimum annual fees for a manufacturer’s, wholesaler’s, and off-premises retailer’s licenses shall be as set forth on the following:

License Class
Cost/year

MANUFACTURERS

Manufacturer’s license, class A. (rectifying plant)
$6,000

Manufacturer’s license, class A. (distillery)
$6,000

Manufacturer’s license, class A. (winery)
$1,500

Manufacturer’s license, class A. (distillery producing more than 50% nonbeverage alcohol)
$3,000

Manufacturer’s license, class B. (brewery)
$5,000

WHOLESALERS

Wholesaler’s license, class A. (beer, wine, and spirits)
$4,000

Wholesaler’s license, class B. (beer and wine)
$2,000

OFF-PREMISES RETAILERS

Retailer’s license (off-premises), class A. (beer, wine, and spirits)
$2,000

Retailer’s license (off-premises), class B. (beer and wine)
$1,000

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 324, ch. 4, § 11
Apr. 30, 1934, 48 Stat. 654, ch. 181, § 1
June 18, 1934, 48 Stat. 997, ch. 588
July 2, 1935, 49 Stat. 444, ch. 359
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 898, 899, ch. 756, §§ 3-7
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, §§ 1, 2
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 133, ch. 146, title V, § 501
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(d)
May 31, 1962, 76 Stat. 89, Pub. L. 87-470, § 1
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1393, Pub. L. 91-535, § 2
Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-102, § 2(a), (b), 23 DCR 8732
Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-73, § 3, 24 DCR 7066
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-157, § 2(b), 27 DCR 5117
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 6, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-204, § 2, 30 DCR 185
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-16, § 3, 30 DCR 3193
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(a), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 5, 34 DCR 907
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-40, § 2(b), 38 DCR 4974
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(e), 41 DCR 1658
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-202, § 2(b), 45 DCR 8412
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(1), 46 DCR 3142
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
1981 Ed., § 25-503.
1973 Ed., § 25-111.